Massachusetts, session 194th, H2939.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Springfield retirement board shall increase the accidental disability retirement allowance payable
to Misael Rodriguez, a retired officer of the police department of the city of Springfield who, as
a result of severe physical injuries sustained during a violent felonious assault while in the
performance of his duties on November 5, 2020, is totally and permanently incapacitated from
performing the essential duties of a police officer.
1.The annual amount of pension payable to Misael Rodriguez shall be equal to the
regular rate of compensation which would have been paid had he continued in service as a police
of 3

officer of the city of Springfield at the grade held by him at the time of his retirement until his
death or reaching mandatory retirement age, whichever comes first. All amounts paid under this
act shall be non-taxable to the extent allowable under state and federal law.
2.Upon attaining the mandatory retirement age for a police officer of the city of
Springfield, Misael Rodriguez shall receive a pension pursuant to section 7 of said chapter 32, a
yearly amount of pension equal to 80 per cent of the annual rate of the compensation he was
receiving on the day before he reaches the mandatory retirement age for a police officer in the
city of Springfield.
3.Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the benefits granted herein
shall be funded and administered by the Springfield retirement board, consistent with and subject
to chapter 32 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Misael
Rodriguez shall be entitled to receive indemnification for all hospital, medical and related
expenses that have been or may be incurred after the date of his retirement as a result of the
injuries sustained by him while in the performance of his duties on November 5, 2020, in
accordance with sections 100 and 100B of chapter 41 of the General Laws.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Springfield
retirement board shall forthwith pay to said Misael Rodriguez the amount credited to him as
accumulated total deductions in the annuity savings fund of the Springfield retirement board as
of the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, if Misael
Rodriguez was married upon retirement then, upon his death, if he is still married to the spouse
of 3

he was married to upon retirement then, should his spouse to whom he was married on the date
upon retirement survive him, the retirement board of the city of Springfield shall pay to the
spouse an annuity in the amount of 75 per cent of the amount of the pension which otherwise
would have been payable to Misael Rodriguez until the spouse's death. The pension benefits
provided for in this section and section 1 shall be subject to section 103 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws.
SECTION 5. In the event that both Misael Rodriguez and his spouse to whom he was
married on the date upon retirement die before their children reach the age of 18 the payments
that would otherwise have been made to Misael Rodriguez' spouse shall be payable, per stirpes,
to each surviving children under the age of 18; provided, however, that payments shall continue
for the benefit of a surviving child 18 years or older who, on or before the date of death of
Misael Rodriguez or his spouse to whom he was married on the date upon retirement, whichever
is later, had been medically determined to be permanently physically or mentally incapacitated
from earning or for the benefit of a child under the age of 22 who is enrolled as a full-time
student as determined by the criteria of the educational institution.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage
of 3